Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 27
PLUMBING AND PLUMBERS

Sec.

§ 39-2701. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2702. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2703. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2704. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2705. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2706 — 39-2710. Board members — Qualifications — Offices — Organization — Compensation. [Repealed.]

§ 39-2711. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2712. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2713. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2714. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2715. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2716. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2717. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2718. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2719. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2720. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2721. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2722. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2723. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2724. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2725. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2726. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2727. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2728. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2729. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2730. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2731. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2732. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2733. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2734. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-2735. [Amended and redesignated.]